Idaho, session 2025, H0298.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 68, Title 33, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 68
HIGH SCHOOL GRADUATION REQUIREMENTS
33-6801. CREDIT REQUIREMENTS. (1) A student shall meet the state mini-
mum graduation requirement for all Idaho public high schools, which includes
a total of forty-six (46) credits, twenty-nine (29) credits of which shall
be in core subjects as described in section 33-6802, Idaho Code, before the
student is eligible to graduate from an Idaho public high school. Students
shall also demonstrate college or career readiness by completing a senior
project as described in section 33-6804, Idaho Code. The local education
agency may establish graduation requirements beyond the state minimum.
(2) For purposes of sections 33-6801 through 33-6805, Idaho Code, the
following definitions shall apply:
(a) "Idaho content standards" means state-adopted standards that serve
as a minimum threshold for academic consistency statewide and that de-
scribe the knowledge, concepts, and skills that students are expected
to acquire at each grade level in each content area.
(b) "Idaho public high school" or "high school" means any public school
that contains grade 12.
(3) One (1) credit shall equal sixty (60) hours of total instruction.
Local education agencies may request a waiver from the requirements of this
subsection by submitting a letter to the state department of education for
approval signed by the superintendent and chair of the board of trustees of
the local education agency. The waiver request shall provide information
and documentation that substantiates the local education agency's reason
for not requiring sixty (60) hours of total instruction per credit.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, a student may also
obtain credits by demonstrating mastery of a subject's Idaho content stan-
dards as defined and approved by the local education agency.
33-6802. CORE SUBJECTS. (1) For purposes of this section, the follow-
ing definitions shall apply:


(a) "Advanced placement" means the advanced placement program adminis-
tered by the college board.
(b) "Career technical education" means formal preparation for
semi-skilled, skilled, technical, or paraprofessional occupations,
usually below the baccalaureate level.
(c) "Dual credit" means coursework in which an Idaho public high school
student is enrolled in a college-level course that is also counted as a
secondary course for high school graduation purposes.
(d) "Laboratory-based course" means a course in which at least one (1)
class period each week is devoted to providing students with the oppor-
tunity to manipulate equipment, materials, and specimens, or develop
skills in observation and analysis and discover, demonstrate, illus-
trate, or test scientific principles or concepts.
(e) "Project-based learning experience" means a hands-on approach to
learning that encourages students to create, interpret, and communi-
cate an original work or project and that assesses the quality and suc-
cess of learning through performance, presentation, and production of
that work or project.
(2) Secondary language arts and communication. Nine (9) credits are
required in secondary language arts and communication courses, eight (8)
credits of which shall be instruction in language arts. Each year of lan-
guage arts shall consist of language study, composition, and literature and
shall be aligned with the Idaho content standards for the appropriate grade
level. One (1) credit of instruction in communications is required, con-
sisting of oral communication and technological applications that include a
course in speech, a course in debate, or a sequence of instructional activi-
ties that meet the Idaho content standards.
(3) Mathematics. Six (6) credits are required in mathematics courses.
Secondary mathematics includes integrated mathematics, applied mathemat-
ics, business mathematics, algebra, geometry, trigonometry, fundamentals
of calculus, probability and statistics, discrete mathematics, precal-
culus, and courses in mathematical problem solving and quantitative rea-
soning, including mathematics taken through career technical education
programs. Dual credit engineering courses and computer science courses that
align with the Idaho content standards for grades 9 through 12, including ad-
vanced placement computer science and dual credit computer science courses
may be counted as a mathematics credit. Students shall complete secondary
mathematics credits in the following areas:
(a) Two (2) credits of algebra I, algebra I-level equivalent integrated
mathematics, or courses that meet the Idaho content standards;
(b) Two (2) credits of geometry, geometry-level equivalent integrated
mathematics, or courses that meet the Idaho content standards; and
(c) Two (2) credits of mathematics of the student's choice.
(4) Science. Six (6) credits are required in science courses, two (2)
of which shall be laboratory-based. Secondary sciences include instruc-
tion in applied sciences, earth, space, and environment sciences, physical
sciences or chemistry, life sciences, biology, and computer science as de-
scribed in subsection (8) of this section.
(5) Social studies. Five (5) credits are required in social studies
courses, which includes one (1) credit in government, two (2) credits in


United States history, including Idaho history, one (1) credit in history of
western civilization, and one (1) credit in economics and financial liter-
acy. Students may earn the economics and financial literacy credit by taking
an advanced academic or career technical education course in that subject
area that provides college credit. Successful completion of the legislative
page program in the Idaho house of representatives or the Idaho senate may
meet the requirement for one (1) government credit. Courses such as geogra-
phy, sociology, and psychology may be offered as electives, but are not to be
counted as credits in social studies.
(6) Humanities. Two (2) credits are required in humanities courses.
Humanities courses include instruction in visual arts, music, theater,
dance, or world language that is aligned with the Idaho content standards
for those subjects. Other courses such as literature, history, philosophy,
architecture, or comparative world religions may satisfy the Idaho content
standards if the course is aligned to the interdisciplinary humanities con-
tent standards.
(7)(a) Health and wellness. One (1) credit is required in health and
wellness courses. The course shall be aligned to the Idaho content
standards. Each student shall receive a minimum of one (1) class period
on psychomotor cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training as out-
lined in the American heart association guidelines for CPR, including
the proper utilization of an automatic external defibrillator.
(b) Students participating in one (1) season of any sport recognized by
the Idaho high school activities association, one (1) season of any club
sport recognized by the local education agency, or eighteen (18) weeks
of a sport recognized by the local education agency may choose to sub-
stitute participation in place of up to one (1) credit of physical edu-
cation. Students shall show mastery of the Idaho content standards in a
format provided by the local education agency.
(8) Computer science. Computer science courses may count as math-
ematics credit or science credit. Students who choose to take computer
science courses may not concurrently count such courses as both a mathemat-
ics and science credit for the same course but may choose whether to count
the courses as mathematics credit or as science credit as determined by the
student. Certified teachers who have completed at least thirty (30) hours
of nationally recognized, course-specific professional learning approved
by the state board of education shall be authorized to provide instruction
in computer science.
33-6803. CONTENT STANDARDS. Each student shall meet locally estab-
lished subject area standards, using state content standards as minimum
requirements, demonstrated through various measures of accountability,
including examinations or other measures.
33-6804. SENIOR PROJECT. The senior project is a culminating project
to illustrate a student's ability to analyze, synthesize, and evaluate in-
formation and communicate that knowledge and understanding. A student shall
complete a senior project by the end of grade 12. Senior projects may be
multi-year projects, group or individual projects, or approved pre-intern-
ship or school-to-work internship programs, at the discretion of the local


education agency. The project shall include elements of research, devel-
opment of a thesis using experiential learning or integrated project-based
learning experiences, and presentation of the project outcome. Additional
requirements for a senior project are at the discretion of the local educa-
tion agency. Completion of a postsecondary certificate or degree at the time
of high school graduation or an approved pre-internship or internship pro-
gram may be used to meet this requirement.
33-6805. CIVICS AND GOVERNMENT PROFICIENCY. Pursuant to section
33-1602, Idaho Code, each local education agency may establish an alternate
path for determining if a student has met the state civics and government
content standards. Alternate paths are open to all students in grades 7
through 12. Any student who has been determined proficient in the state
civics and government content standards through the completion of the civics
test, completion of an associated college credit-bearing examination, or
completion of an alternate path shall have it noted on the student's high
school transcript.
33-6806. MIDDLE SCHOOL. (1) A middle school student meets the high
school content and credit area requirement for any high school course if the
following requirements are met:
(a) The student completes the course with a grade of "C" or higher be-
fore entering grade 9;
(b) The course meets the same Idaho content standards that are required
in high school for the same course; and
(c) The course is taught by a teacher properly certified to teach high
school content and who meets the federal definition of "highly quali-
fied" for the course being taught.
(2) The student shall be given a grade for the successful completion of
the course. The grade and the number of credit hours assigned to the course
will be transferred to the student's high school transcript. The student's
parent or legal guardian shall be notified in advance when credits are going
to be transcribed and may elect to not have the grade and credits transferred
to the student's high school transcript. Courses taken in middle school
appearing in the student's high school transcript pursuant to this section
shall count for the purpose of high school graduation. However, the student
shall complete the required number of credits in all high school core sub-
jects as identified in section 33-6802, Idaho Code. The transcribing high
school is required to verify that the course meets the requirements speci-
fied in this section.
33-6807. SPECIAL EDUCATION STUDENTS. A student who is eligible for
special education services under the individuals with disabilities educa-
tion improvement act may, with the assistance of the student's individual-
ized education program team, meet the graduation requirements through the
current Idaho special education manual specifications.
33-6808. FOREIGN EXCHANGE STUDENTS. A foreign exchange student may be
eligible for graduation by completing a comparable program as approved by
the local education agency.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.